csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_aw.yaml
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawiwaad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: mikoonegwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: mikaakwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaawaad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: mikawiyangidwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: mikoonangwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagowaad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagod
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: mikooneg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: mikaak
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: mikawiyangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: mikoonang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: mikaagooyeg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: mikaagooyan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: mikawangidwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: mikawangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: mikawangwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: mikawang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: mikaagooyaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: mikaagooyeg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: mikaagooyan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: mikawindwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimind
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: mikawind
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: mikaagooyaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: mikaagooyang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagosiwaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagosiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagosiwamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagosigwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagosinigoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagosigoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagosiwaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagosiwangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: mikoosinowagoogoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: mikoosinowaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwagwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwagiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwagiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: mikawisiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwegwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: mikawisiwaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: mikawisiwamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwadwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwadiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwadiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: mikawisiwaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawisigwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: mikaagoosiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: mikoosinowegwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasigwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: mikawisiwangidwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: mikoosinowangwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagosigwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagosigoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawisigoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: mikaagoosiwamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: mikoosinowegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasigoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: mikawisiwangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: mikoosinowangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: mikoosinokwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: mikoosinokiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwangidwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: mikawangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwangwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: mikaagoosiwaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: mikaagoosiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: mikaagoosiwamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiwindwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwindiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiwindiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: mikaagoosiwaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: mikaagoosiwangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagoyaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagoyegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagoyamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagowaapan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagonipan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagopan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagoyaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagoyangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: mikoonagoogoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: mikoonaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawagwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimagiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawagiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: mikawiyegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawegwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: mikawegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: mikawiyaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: mikawiyamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawadwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimadiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawadiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: mikawiyaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawiwaapan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: mikaagooyegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: mikoonegwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaawaapan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: mikawiyangidwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: mikoonangwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagowaapan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagopan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawipan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: mikaagooyamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: mikoonegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaapan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: mikawiyangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: mikoonangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: mikaakwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: mikaakiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: mikawangidwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: mikawangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: mikawangwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: mikawangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: mikaagooyaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: mikaagooyegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: mikaagooyamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: mikawindwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimindiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: mikawindiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: mikaagooyaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: mikaagooyangiban
